Wisconsin, session 2025, AB1011.
do enact as follows:AB1011,11Section 1. 655.017 of the statutes is amended to read:AB1011,2,92655.017 Limitation on noneconomic damages. The amount of 3noneconomic damages recoverable by a claimant or plaintiff under this chapter for 4acts or omissions of a health care provider if the act or omission occurs on or after 5April 6, 2006 the effective date of this section .... [LRB inserts date], and for acts or 6omissions of an employee of a health care provider, acting within the scope of his or 7her employment and providing health care services, for acts or omissions occurring 8on or after April 6, 2006 the effective date of this section .... [LRB inserts date], is 9subject to the limits under s. 893.55 (4) (d) and (f).AB1011,210Section 2. 893.55 (1d) of the statutes is repealed and recreated to read:AB1011,2,1711893.55 (1d) The objective of the treatment of this section is to ensure 12affordable and accessible health care for all of the citizens of Wisconsin while 13providing adequate compensation to the victims of medical malpractice. Achieving 14this objective requires a balancing of many interests. The legislature finds that the 15limitation of $3,000,000 represents an appropriate balance between providing 16reasonable compensation for noneconomic damages associated with medical 17malpractice and ensuring affordable and accessible health care.AB1011,318Section 3. 893.55 (4) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1011,3,519893.55 (4) (b) The total noneconomic damages recoverable for bodily injury, 20including any action or proceeding based on contribution or indemnification and 21any action for a claim by a person other than the injured person for noneconomic 22damages recoverable for bodily injury, may not exceed the limit under par. (d) for 1each occurrence on or after April 6, 2006 the effective date of this paragraph .... 2[LRB inserts date], from all health care providers and all employees of health care 3providers acting within the scope of their employment and providing health care 4services who are found negligent and from the injured patients and families 5compensation fund.AB1011,46Section 4. 893.55 (4) (d) 1. of the statutes is amended to read:AB1011,3,97893.55 (4) (d) 1. The limit on total noneconomic damages for each occurrence 8under par. (b) on or after April 6, 2006 the effective date of this subdivision .... [LRB 9inserts date], shall be $750,000 $3,000,000.AB1011,3,1010